Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
CONGENITAL SYPHILIS

§325-51 Blood samples of pregnant women
required. Every physician attending a pregnant woman in the State for
conditions relating to the woman's pregnancy during the period of gestation or
at delivery, shall, in the case of every woman so attended, take or cause to be
taken one or more samples of the blood of the woman, except when the attending
physician shall have evidence that a pregnant woman has met this requirement
through a previous test for syphilis, and shall submit such samples to an
approved laboratory for a standard serologic test for syphilis. Every other
person permitted by law to attend pregnant women in the State, but not
permitted by law to take blood samples, shall cause one or more samples of the
blood of every pregnant woman attended by the person to be taken by a duly
licensed physician or state certified laboratory, or any other person permitted
by law to withdraw blood and shall have the samples submitted to an approved
laboratory for a standard serologic test for syphilis. The samples of blood
shall be taken at such times during the period of gestation as are designated
by rules adopted by the department of health. Every pregnant woman shall
permit the sample of the woman's blood to be taken as hereinabove provided. [L
1943, c 219, §1; RL 1945, §2310; RL 1955, §49-50; HRS §325-51; am L 1983, c 82,
§1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next